District of Columbia statutes.
10-1804

Allocation of sales tax revenue attributable to the Waterfront Park Retail Area.

(a)

During the contribution period, the sales and use tax revenue attributable to the Waterfront Park Retail Area shall be allocated and deposited into the Waterfront Park Maintenance Fund in the following amounts:

(1)

In the 12-month period beginning July 1, 2012, $380,000—or the amount of sales and use tax revenue attributable to the Waterfront Park Retail Area—if less than $380,000;

(2)

In each 12-month period beginning on each July 1 thereafter that is within the contribution period, an amount equal to $380,000, increased annually by the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple of $50, rounded to the next lowest multiple of $50)—or the amount of sales and use tax revenue attributable to the Waterfront Park Retail Area—if less.

(b)

All sales and use tax revenue and revenue from the Waterfront Park Special Assessment received by the Chief Financial Officer by the 20th day of a month shall be deposited into the Fund by the Chief Financial Officer by the last business day of the following month.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-105, § 5, 57 DCR 11
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 74, 59 DCR 6190
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 8042(c), 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 10-1801.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); substituted “$380,000 — or the amount of sales and use tax revenue attributable to the Waterfront Park Retail Area — if less than $380,000” for “$380,000” in (a)(1); substituted “annually by the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple of $50, rounded to the next lowest multiple of $50) — or the amount of sales and use tax revenue attributable to the Waterfront Park Retail Area — if less” for “by the increase in the CPI during the period from July 1, 2012, to the beginning of that 12-month period” in (a)(2); and added (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8042(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8042(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 8041 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle E of Title VIII of the act may be cited as the “Waterfront Park at the Yards Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 8044 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that §§ 8042 and 8043 of the act shall apply as of March 3, 2010.